Hawaii statutes.
[§103D-109] Compliance audit unit;
government officers and employees to cooperate. The officers and employees
of the State and of each county shall cooperate with this unit and furnish to
them such information related to procurement activities as may be called for in
connection with the research activities of this unit. The information shall be
provided in a timely manner and shall be free of charge. [L Sp 1993, c 8, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next